Hawaii statutes.
C. Personal Property

§651-121 Certain personal property and
insurance thereon, exempt. The following described personal property of an
individual up to the value set forth shall be exempt from attachment and
execution as follows:

(1) All necessary household furnishings and
appliances, books and wearing apparel, ordinarily and reasonably necessary to,
and personally used by a debtor or the debtor's family residing with the
debtor; and, in addition thereto, jewelry, watches, and items of personal adornment
up to an aggregate cash value not exceeding $1,000;

(2) One motor vehicle up to a value of $2,575 over
and above all liens and encumbrances on the motor vehicle; provided that the
value of the motor vehicle shall be measured by established wholesale used car
prices customarily found in guides used by Hawaii motor vehicle dealers; or, if
not listed in such guides, fair wholesale market value, with necessary
adjustment for condition;

(3) Any combination of the following: tools,
implements, instruments, uniforms, furnishings, books, equipment, one
commercial fishing boat and nets, one motor vehicle, and other personal
property ordinarily and reasonably necessary to and personally owned and used
by the debtor in the exercise of the debtor's trade, business, calling, or
profession by which the debtor earns the debtor's livelihood;

(4) One parcel of land, not exceeding two hundred
fifty square feet in size, niche or interment space owned, used, or occupied by
any person, or by any person jointly with any other person or persons, in any
graveyard, cemetery, or other place for the sole purpose of burying the dead,
together with the railing or fencing enclosing the same, and all gravestones,
tombstones, monuments, and other appropriate improvements thereon erected;

(5) The proceeds of insurance on, and the proceeds of
the sale of, the property in this section mentioned, for the period of six
months from the date the proceeds are received; and

(6) The wages, salaries, commissions, and all other
compensation for personal services due to the debtor for services rendered
during the thirty-one days before the date of the proceeding. [L 1976, c 136,
pt of §2; am L 1978, c 46, §11; gen ch 1985; am L 1999, c 37, §2]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) Paragraphs
(1) to (4), punctuation changed; and

(2) Paragraph
(5), punctuation changed and "and" added after ending punctuation.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next